Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-6,106
Accidents; reports; expenses; reimbursement to county by Department of Transportation.

The Department of Transportation shall reimburse any county for expenses and costs incurred by the county pursuant to sections 60-6,101 to 60-6,105. The department shall provide the official in each county with the appropriate reporting form.

Laws 1974, LB 66, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,104.11;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 202;

Laws 1993, LB 590, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 190.